District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Henry E. Baker Alley Designation Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to sections 401, 403, and 421 of the Street and Alley Closing and
Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official
Code §§ 9-204.01, 9-204.03, and 9-204.21), the Council officially designates the public alley
system in Square 2857, bounded by Harvard Street, NW, Sherman Avenue, NW, Girard Street,
NW, and 11th Street, NW, as depicted by the plat in the committee report, as “Henry E. Baker
Alley”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2